Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 272. MORRIS COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER F. LAKE TEXARKANA AND DAINGERFIELD LAKE

Sec. 272.051. DISCHARGE OF FIREARMS. (a) Except as provided in Subsection (b) of this section, no person may shoot a pistol or rifle in, on, along, or across Daingerfield Lake or Lake Texarkana in Morris County.

(b) This section does not apply to peace officers, game wardens, or agents of the department in the lawful exercise of their duty or to persons hunting with a shotgun during an open season in or on Daingerfield Lake or Lake Texarkana.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.